Utah statutes.
76-8-503.   False or inconsistent statements.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if:

(1) (a)  he makes a false statement under oath or affirmation or swears or affirms the truth of the statement previously made and he does not believe the statement to be true if:

(i)  the falsification occurs in an official proceeding, or is made with a purpose to mislead a public servant in performing his official functions; or

(ii)  the statement is one which is authorized by law to be sworn or affirmed before a notary or other person authorized to administer oaths; or

(b)  he makes inconsistent statements under oath or affirmation, both within the period of limitations, one of which is false and not believed by him to be true.

(2)  A person is not guilty under this section if the falsification is retracted before it becomes manifest that the falsification was or would be exposed.



Amended by Chapter 324, 1997 General Session

